South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3289.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-47-10 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (51) "First responder" means an emergency medical services provider, a law enforcement officer, or a fire department worker directly engaged in examining, treating, or directing persons during an emergency, or a 911 professional, which includes call takers and dispatchers. SECTION 2.  Chapter 47, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-47-85.  A 911 professional is a first responder entitled to all benefits that accrue to first responders employed by the State and its local governing bodies. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----